North Dakota, session 69, HB1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER - COUNTY FAIR RESILIENCY GRANT PROGRAM - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund
in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,500,000, or so much of the sum as may
be necessary, to the agriculture commissioner for the purpose of providing grants to county agriculture
fair associations for the planning, design, and construction of infrastructure projects, for the period
beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027. The agriculture commissioner
may not award more than $100,000 to a county agriculture fair association under this program. The
agriculture commissioner shall create guidelines to distribute the grant funding, including the
requirement for a recipient to provide one dollar of matching funds from nonstate sources for every
two dollars of grant funding received. The guidelines may provide for matching funds to be provided in
the form of cash or in-kind contributions. The funding in this section is considered a one-time funding
item.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1591 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1591 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 12 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State